Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.380

Assessments on omitted property—Confirmation ordinance—Collection.

At the conclusion of the hearing or any adjournment thereof upon proposed assessments on omitted property the council shall consider the matter as though the property were included in the original roll and may confirm the roll or any portion thereof by ordinance. Thereupon the roll of omitted property shall be certified to the treasurer for collection as other assessments.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.380. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 37, part; RRS s 9390, part.]